Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.080

Testimony reduced to writing in certain cases and witnesses recognized.

In all cases where murder or manslaughter is supposed to have been committed, the testimony of witnesses taken before the coroner's jury shall be reduced to writing by the coroner, or under his or her direction, and he or she shall also recognize such witnesses to appear and testify in the superior court of the county, and shall forthwith file the written testimony, inquisition, and recognizance with the clerk of such court.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4035; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.080. Prior: Code 1881 s 2783; 1863 p 561 s 9; 1854 p 437 s 9; RRS s 4188.]